District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.04

Role of Board.

(a)

The Board is responsible for implementing this subchapter and the District’s responsibilities under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, approved August 28, 1986 (100 Stat. 924; 42 U.S.C. 1973ff et seq.).

(b)

The Board shall make available to covered voters information regarding voter registration procedures for covered voters and procedures for casting military-overseas ballots.

(c)

The Board shall establish an electronic transmission system through which a covered voter may apply for and receive voter registration materials, military-overseas ballots, and other information under this subchapter.

(d)

The Board shall:

(1)

Develop standardized absentee-voting materials, including privacy and transmission envelopes, authentication materials, and voting instructions to be used with the military-overseas ballot of a voter authorized to vote in any jurisdiction in the District; and

(2)

Repealed.

(e)

The Board shall prescribe the form and content of a declaration for use by a covered voter to swear or affirm specific representations pertaining to the voter’s identity, eligibility to vote, status as a covered voter, and timely and proper completion of an overseas-military ballot. The declaration must be based on the declaration prescribed to accompany a federal write-in absentee ballot, as modified to be consistent with this subchapter. The Board shall ensure that a form for the execution of the declaration, including an indication of the date of execution of the declaration, is a prominent part of all balloting materials for which the declaration is required.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 104, 59 DCR 2542
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-273, § 4(b), 62 DCR 1938

History

This section is referenced in § 1-1061.06 and § 1-1061.07.

Section References

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-273 repealed (d)(2).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-273, § 5, see § 21 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).

Temporary Legislation

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 4 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-273: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-273 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined that the fiscal effect of D.C. Law 20-273 has been included in an approved budget and financial plan.